District of Columbia statutes.
50-301.09a

Repealed

Hearing examiner; appointment, powers and duties; appeals.

Repealed.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-97, § 10a
as added Jan. 30, 1990, D.C. Law 8-59, § 2(c), 36 DCR 7384
May 1, 1990, D.C. Law 8-107, § 2(c), 37 DCR 1623
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-198, § 501(e), 43 DCR 4569
1981 Ed., § 40-1709.1.
2001 Ed., § 50-309.01.
For temporary (225 day) repeal of section, see § 501(e) of Fiscal Year 1997 Budget Support Temporary Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Law 11-226, April 9, 1997, law notification 44 DCR 2584).
For temporary repeal of section, see § 501(e) of the Fiscal Year 1997 Budget Support Emergency Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-302, July 25, 1996, 43 DCR 4181), § 501(e) of the Fiscal Year 1997 Budget Support Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-429, October 29, 1996, 43 DCR 6151), and § 501(e) of the Fiscal Year 1997 Budget Support Congressional Adjournment Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-2, February 19, 1997, 44 DCR 1590).

D.C. Law 11-226, title V, § 501(e) ( 44 DCR 124), eff. April 9, 1997, provided for the temporary repeal of this section.

Title XII, § 1201(b) of D.C. Law 11-226 provided for expiration “after 225 days of its having taken effect, or upon the effective date of the Fiscal Year 1997 Budget Support Amendment Act of 1996, whichever occurs first.”